Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 6. Burden of Proof

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums §§ 27 to 62; 61 Am. Jur. 2d Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers §§ 318 to 344.

31A C.J.S. Evidence §§ 120 to 129; 70 C.J.S. Physicians and Surgeons § 118.

§ 1-12-601.
Injury by health care providers; burden of proof.

In an action for injury alleging negligence by a health care provider the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving:

If the defendant is certified by a national certificating board or association, that the defendant failed to act in accordance with the standard of care adhered to by that national board or association; or

If the defendant is not so certified, that the defendant failed to act in accordance with the standard of care adhered to by health care providers in good standing performing similar health care services.

In either paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section, variations in theory of medical practice or localized circumstances regarding availability of equipment, facilities or supplies may be shown to contravene proof offered on the applicable standard of care.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 45, § 1.

Expert testimony. —

In a medical malpractice case, it was an abuse of discretion for the district court to preclude plaintiff's expert's standard of care testimony because the defendant's doctor's infectious disease expert was allowed to give standard of care testimony while plaintiff's was not. Armstrong v. Hrabal, 2004 WY 39, 87 P.3d 1226,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. May 11, 2004).

In a medical malpractice case, a court did not err by sustaining defendant doctor's objection to testimony from plaintiff's retained emergency medicine expert where plaintiff's counsel made no offer of proof, counsel did not explain to the district court his plan to pursue the standard of care in six sub-categories nor did he make an offer of proof to alert the court to how the proposed testimony would differ from earlier testimony. Further, the record did not suggest that such a plan of attack was apparent from the previous questions. Armstrong v. Hrabal, 2004 WY 39, 87 P.3d 1226,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. May 11, 2004).

Unpublished decision:

In a medical malpractice action arising from a physician's treatment of a patient's abdominal pain, the district court properly allowed the testimony of a general surgeon under Fed. R. Evid. 702 as to the standard of care; the general surgeon did not stray from his area of expertise, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-12-601

did not suggest a per se rule that only a board-certified specialist such as a gastroenterologist could provide testimony against another board-certified specialist.
Poche v. Joubran, 389 Fed. Appx. 768,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 15482

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

In a medical
malpractice case, an expert's testimony regarding the standard of
care was proper because the studies cited by the expert were relevant
to rebut plaintiff's claim that the doctor deviated from the standard
of care; the testimony was not that the doctor followed the alternative
guidelines, but rather that his exercise of clinical judgment was
consistent with the guidelines. Miller v. Beyer, 2014 WY 84, 329 P.3d 956,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2014).

Interpretation. —

This section is clearly not intended to immunize board certified doctors from all liability.
Pina v. Christensen, 2009 WY 64, 206 P.3d 1298,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2009).

Instructions to jury. —

In a medical malpractice action, the court correctly gave a standard of care instruction which stated that proper technique for administering an injection is the same for doctors, nurses, and other health care professionals and that the defendant medical assistant's actions were to be measured by such standard. Beavis v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 2001 WY 32, 20 P.3d 508,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. Apr. 17, 2001).

In a medical malpractice suit filed against a board-certified urologist, the trial court did not err by instructing the jury that in order for it to find that the doctor was negligent, it had to find by a preponderance of the evidence that he failed to act in accordance with the standard of care adhered to by the American Board of Urology; the instruction was a correct statement of the law as set forth in this section.
Pina v. Christensen, 2009 WY 64, 206 P.3d 1298,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Nalder v. West Park Hosp., 254 F.3d 1168,

2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 12399

(10th Cir. 2001); Garnett v. Coyle, 2001 WY 94, 33 P.3d 114,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Medical malpractice: hospital's liability for injury allegedly caused by failure to have properly qualified staff, 62 ALR4th 692.

Medical practitioner's liability for treatment given child without parent's consent, 67 ALR4th 511.

Malpractice involving hysterectomies and oophorectomies, 86 ALR4th 18.

Gynecological malpractice not involving hysterectomies or oophorectomies, 86 ALR4th 125.

Malpractice: physician's duty, under informed consent doctrine, to obtain patient's consent to treatment in pregnancy or childbirth cases, 89 ALR4th 799.

Liability of physician, nurse, or hospital for failure to contact physician or to keep physician sufficiently informed concerning status of mother during pregnancy, labor and childbirth, 3 ALR5th 123.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by inadequate attendance or monitoring of patient during and after pregnancy, labor, and delivery, 3 ALR5th 146.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper choice between, or timing of, vaginal or cesarean delivery, 4 ALR5th 148.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper procedures during vaginal delivery, 4 ALR5th 210.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper treatment during labor, 6 ALR5th 490.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother caused by improper postdelivery diagnosis, care, and representations, 6 ALR5th 534.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper diagnosis and treatment of mother relating to and during pregnancy, 7 ALR5th 1.

Medical malpractice: physician's admission of negligence as establishing standard of care and breach of that standard, 42 ALR5th 1.

Medical malpractice in connection with diagnosis, care, or treatment of diabetes, 43 ALR5th 87.

Malpractice in diagnosis and treatment of male urinary tract and related organs, 48 ALR5th 575.

Liability of health maintenance organizations (HMOs) for negligence of member physicians, 51 ALR5th 271.

Malpractice in diagnosis or treatment of meningitis, 51 ALR5th 301.